apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.fr.metadix
    <pardef n="d/evoir__vbmod">
            
<e><p><l>evaient</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evais</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evais</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evait</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evant</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evant</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evez</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>eviez</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>eviez</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evions</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evions</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evoir</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evons</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evra</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evrai</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evraient</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evrais</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evrais</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evrait</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evras</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evrez</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evriez</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evrions</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evrons</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>evront</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ois</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ois</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oit</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oive</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oive</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oivent</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oivent</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>oives</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ue</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ues</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>urent</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>us</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>us</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>us</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>usse</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ussent</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>usses</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ussiez</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ussions</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ut</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>û</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ûmes</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ût</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ûtes</l><r>evoir<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/ieu__n">
            
<e><p><l>ieu</l><r>ieu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ieux</l><r>ieu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>éesse</l><r>ieu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>éesses</l><r>ieu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/uquel__rel">
            
<e><p><l>e<b/>laquelle</l><r>uquel<s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>esquelles</l><r>uquel<s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>esquels</l><r>uquel<s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>uquel</l><r>uquel<s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
   <pardef n="ce/lui_que__rel">
            
<e><p><l>lle<b/>que</l><r>lui<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lles<b/>que</l><r>lui<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lui<b/>que</l><r>lui<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ux<b/>que</l><r>lui<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l><b/>que</l><r>lui<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   
    </pardef>     
    
    <pardef n="ce/_que__rel">
<e><p><l><b/>que</l><r>lui<b/>que<s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l><b/>que</l><r><b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- fix :( -->
   
    </pardef>    

    <pardef n="ce_qu’il_y_a__rel">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ce/lui_qui__rel">
            
<e><p><l>lle<b/>qui</l><r>lui<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lles<b/>qui</l><r>lui<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>lui<b/>qui</l><r>lui<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            
<e><p><l>ux<b/>qui</l><r>lui<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l><b/>qui</l><r>lui<b/>qui<s n="rel"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>  
    
    

          <e lm="devoir"><i>d</i><par n="d/evoir__vbmod"/></e>
	  <e lm="celui qui" r="LR"><i>ce</i><par n="ce/lui_qui__rel"/></e>
	  <e lm="celui qui" r="RL"><p><l><a/>ce</l><r>ce</r></p><par n="ce/lui_qui__rel"/></e>
	  <e lm="celui que" r="LR"><i>ce</i><par n="ce/lui_que__rel"/></e>
	  <e lm="ce que"><i>ce</i><par n="ce/_que__rel"/></e>
	  <e lm="ce qu’il y a"><i>ce<b/>qu’il<b/>y<b/>a</i><par n="ce_qu’il_y_a__rel"/></e>
          <e lm="dieu"><i>d</i><par n="d/ieu__n"/></e>
